Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 3. Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact

§ 33-21-301.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Advanced Practice Registered Nurse Compact.”

History.

2016 ch. 11, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 10 § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2016.